Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Adult Education Learning System

151B.400.
Legislative findings. [Repealed and reenacted.]

151B.401.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky finds and declares that:

The economic future of the Commonwealth and the prosperity of its citizens depend on the ability of Kentucky businesses to compete effectively in the world economy;

A well-educated and highly trained workforce provides businesses in the Commonwealth with the competitive edge critical for their success; and

Too many adult Kentuckians are not full participants in the labor pool because they lack a high school diploma, its equivalent, or the workplace knowledge necessary to assure self-sufficiency for themselves and their families.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 487, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 2006, ch. 211, § 167, effective July 12, 2006; repealed and reenacted by 2019 ch. 146, § 38, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.402.
Legislative findings relating to need for High School Equivalency Diplomas — Incentives — Administrative regulations — Learning contracts — Tuition discounts — Tax credit for employers.

The General Assembly recognizes the critical condition of the educational level of Kentucky’s adult population and seeks to stimulate the attendance at, and successful completion of, programs that provide a High School Equivalency Diploma. Incentives shall be provided to full-time employees who complete a High School Equivalency Diploma program within one (1) year and their employers.

The Office of Adult Education within the Department of Workforce Investment in the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish the operational procedures for this section. The administrative regulations shall include but not be limited to the criteria for:

A learning contract that includes the process to develop a learning contract between the student and the adult education instructor with the employer’s agreement to participate and support the student;

Attendance reports that validate that the student is enrolled and studying for the High School Equivalency Diploma during the release time from work; and

Final reports that qualify the student for the tuition discounts under subsection (3)(a) of this section and that qualify the employer for tax credits under subsection (4) of the section.

An individual who has been out of secondary school for at least three (3) years, develops and successfully completes a learning contract that requires a minimum of five (5) hours per week to study for the High School Equivalency Diploma program, and successfully earns a High School Equivalency Diploma shall earn a tuition discount of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per semester for a maximum of four (4) semesters at one (1) of Kentucky’s public postsecondary institutions.
(3) (a)

An individual who has been out of secondary school for at least three (3) years, develops and successfully completes a learning contract that requires a minimum of five (5) hours per week to study for the High School Equivalency Diploma program, and successfully earns a High School Equivalency Diploma shall earn a tuition discount of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per semester for a maximum of four (4) semesters at one (1) of Kentucky’s public postsecondary institutions.

The program shall work with the postsecondary institutions to establish notification procedures for students who qualify for the tuition discount.

An employer who assists an individual to complete his or her learning contract under the provisions of this section shall receive a state tax credit against the income tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, with credit ordering as provided in KRS 141.0205 for a portion of the released time given to the employee to study for the tests. The application for the tax credit shall be supported with attendance documentation provided by the Office of Adult Education and calculated by multiplying fifty percent (50%) of the hours released for study by the student’s hourly salary, and not to exceed a credit of one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1250).

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 526, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 211, § 37, effective July 12, 2006; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 38, effective June 28, 2006; repealed and reenact. Acts 2013, ch. 59, § 33, effective June 25, 2013; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2019, ch. 146, § 39, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.403.
Adult education programs aligned with federal college and career readiness standards — High School Equivalency Diploma — Programs and examinations — Previously issued equivalency or external diploma to be considered High School Equivalency Diploma — Validity of diplomas after changes in test selection.

The Office of Adult Education within the Department of Workforce Investment in the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish programs aligned with the College and Career Readiness Standards for Adult Education, or any other similar standards adopted by the federal Office of Career, Technical, and Adult Education, which upon successful completion, shall result in the issuance of a High School Equivalency Diploma.

At least one (1) program authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall include a test aligned with the College and Career Readiness Standards for Adult Education, or any other standards adopted by the federal Office of Career, Technical, and Adult Education, to serve as a qualifying test, which upon passing, shall entitle students to receive a High School Equivalency Diploma.

For purposes of any public employment, a High School Equivalency Diploma shall be considered equal to a high school diploma issued under the provisions of KRS 158.140.

A High School Equivalency Diploma shall be issued without charge upon successfully completing a High School Equivalency Diploma program. A fee may be assessed by the Office of Adult Education for the issuance of a duplicate High School Equivalency Diploma and for issuance of a duplicate score report. All fees collected for duplicate diplomas and score reports shall be used to support the adult education program.

The Office of Adult Education is authorized to contract annually with an institution of higher education or other appropriate agency or entity for scoring High School Equivalency Diploma program examinations.

On June 29, 2017, any high school equivalency diploma or external diploma previously recognized or issued by the Commonwealth shall be considered retroactively as a High School Equivalency Diploma.

Upon issuance, a High School Equivalency Diploma shall not be invalidated by any subsequent changes in test selection under this section.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 192, § 1; 1986, ch. 311, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 361, § 12, effective July 15, 1988; repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 23, effective July 1, 1990; 1990, 476, § 167; 1994, ch. 363, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 469, § 23, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 145, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 63, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 29, § 13, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 211, § 36, effective July 12, 2006; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013, ch. 59, § 32, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2019, ch. 146, § 40, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.404.
Definitions.

“Adult education” means, for programs funded under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, services or instruction below the postsecondary level for individuals:

Who have attained the age of sixteen (16) years of age;

Who are not enrolled or required to be enrolled in secondary school under state law; and

Who:

Lack sufficient mastery of basic educational skills to enable the individuals to function effectively in society;

Are unable to speak, read, or write the English language; or

Do not have a secondary school diploma or its recognized equivalent, and have not achieved an equivalent level of education;

“Family literacy services” means services that are of sufficient intensity in terms of hours, and of sufficient duration, to assist a family to make sustainable increases in its literacy level, and integrate the activities described in KRS 158.360; and

“Literacy” means an individual’s ability to read, write, and speak in English and compute and solve problems at levels of proficiency necessary to function on the job and in society to achieve one’s goals and develop one’s knowledge and potential.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 487, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 526, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; repealed and reenact., Acts 2006, ch. 211, § 168, effective July 12, 2006; 2013, ch. 59, § 36, effective June 25, 2013; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2019, ch. 146, § 41, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.405.
Definitions for KRS 151B.400 to 151B.410. [Repealed and reenacted.]

151B.406.
Office of Adult Education — Educational strategy and responsibilities — Organization — Sole agency for developing and approving state plans.

The Office of Adult Education is created within the Department of Workforce Investment in the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet to carry out the statewide adult education mission. The office shall implement a twenty (20) year state strategy to reduce the number of adults who are at the lowest levels of literacy and most in need of adult education and literacy services. The office shall have responsibility for all functions related to adult education and literacy. The office shall:

Promote coordination of programs and responsibilities linked to the issue of adult education with other agencies and institutions;

Facilitate the development of strategies to increase the knowledge and skills of adults in all counties by promoting the efficient and effective coordination of all available education and training resources;

Lead a statewide public information and marketing campaign to convey the critical nature of Kentucky’s adult literacy challenge and to reach adults and employers with practical information about available education and training opportunities;

Establish standards for adult literacy and monitor progress in achieving the state’s adult literacy goals, including existing standards that may have been developed to meet requirements of federal law in conjunction with the Collaborative Center for Literacy Development: Early Childhood through Adulthood; and

Administer the adult education and literacy initiative fund created under KRS 151B.409.

The Office of Adult Education shall be organized in a manner as directed by the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet. The office shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet.

The Office of Adult Education shall be the agency solely designated for the purpose of developing and approving state plans required by state or federal laws or regulations.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 211, § 98, effective July 12, 2006; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2019, ch. 146, § 45, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.407.
Foundation for Adult Education.

There is hereby established a nonprofit foundation to be known as the “Foundation for Adult Education.” The purpose of the foundation shall be to supplement public funding for adult training in order to expand existing basic skills training programs.

Funding for the foundation shall be obtained through contributions by the private sector. The foundation shall be empowered to solicit and accept funds from the private sector to be used for grants to local education agencies to fund adult basic education programs especially designed for business and industry. Contributors may specify that contributed funds be used to improve the educational level of their employees as it relates to the High School Equivalency Diploma program.

The foundation shall be governed by a board of trustees to be appointed by the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet with responsibility for adult education programs based on recommendations from business, industry, labor, education, and interested citizens. Staff for the board of trustees shall be provided by the cabinet.

The foundation shall be attached to the office of the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet for administrative purposes.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 24, effective July 1, 1990; 1996, ch. 217, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2003, ch. 29, § 14, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 211, § 38, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 19, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 15, § 4, effective June 25, 2013; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 59, § 34, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 63, § 20, effective June 29, 2017; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2019, ch. 146, § 46, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.408.
Adult education and literacy system — Services — Duties and responsibilities of the Office of Adult Education.

The Office of Adult Education shall promulgate necessary administrative regulations and administer a statewide adult education and literacy system throughout the state. The adult education and literacy system shall include diverse educational services provided by credentialed professionals, based on the learners’ current needs and a commitment to lifelong learning.
(1) (a)

The Office of Adult Education shall promulgate necessary administrative regulations and administer a statewide adult education and literacy system throughout the state. The adult education and literacy system shall include diverse educational services provided by credentialed professionals, based on the learners’ current needs and a commitment to lifelong learning.

Services shall be provided at multiple sites appropriate for adult learning, including vocational and technical colleges, community colleges, comprehensive universities, adult education centers, public schools, libraries, family resource centers, adult correctional facilities, other institutions, and through the Kentucky Commonwealth Virtual University. Services shall be targeted to communities with the greatest need based on the number of adults at literacy levels I and II as defined by the 1997 Kentucky Adult Literacy Survey and other indicators of need.

Access and referral services shall be initiated at multiple points including businesses, educational institutions, labor organizations, employment offices, and government offices.

Multiple funding sources, program support, and partnerships to administer the adult education and literacy system may include student scholarship and grants; fees for services rendered; and other general, agency, local, state, federal, and private funds.

Services included as part of the adult education and literacy system shall include but not be limited to functionally-contexted workplace essential skills training based on employers’ needs, leading to a competency-based certificate indicating proficiency in critical thinking, computating, reading, writing, communicating, problem solving, team-building, and use of technology at various worksites regarding basic skills.

In administering an adult education and literacy system, the Office of Adult Education shall:

Assist providers with the development of quality job-specific and workplace essential skills instruction for workers in business and industry, literacy and adult basic education, adult secondary education, including High School Equivalency Diploma program preparation, English as a second language, and family literacy programs, in cooperation with local business, labor, economic development, educational, employment, and service support entities;

Provide assessments of each student’s skill and competency level allowing assessments to be shared with other educational and employment entities when necessary for providing additional educational programs, taking into consideration student confidentiality;

Assist adult educators to meet professional standards;

Create an awareness program in cooperation with the Administrative Office of the Courts to ensure that District and Circuit Court Judges are aware of the provisions of KRS 533.200 and the methods to access adult education and literacy programs for persons sentenced under the statute;

Develop administrative regulations including those for business and industry service participation and mechanisms for service funding through all appropriate federal, state, local, and private resources;

Require and monitor compliance with the program’s administrative regulations and policies; and

Develop and implement performance measures and benchmarks.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 487, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 143, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 54, effective May 30, 1997; 2000, ch. 526, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 211, § 55, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 113, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013, ch. 59, §
35, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 63, § 21, effective June 29, 2017; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2019, ch. 146, § 47, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.409.
Adult education and literacy initiative fund.

There is created in the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet a special fund to be known as the adult education and literacy initiative fund, which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the General Assembly, gifts, grants, other sources of funding, public and private, and interest accrued by the fund. This fund shall not lapse at the end of a fiscal year but shall be carried forward to be used only for the purposes specified in this section. Moneys accumulated in this fund on June 27, 2019, shall remain in the fund and be transferred to the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet to be used for purposes stated in this section.

The purpose of the adult education and literacy initiative fund shall be to support strategies for adult education, to provide statewide initiatives for excellence, and to provide funds for research and development activities.

The cabinet shall establish the guidelines for the use, distribution, and administration of the fund, financial incentives, technical assistance, and other support for strategic planning; and guidelines for fiscal agents to assess county and area needs and to develop strategies to meet those needs.

The fund shall include the following strategies:

Statewide initiatives. Funds shall be used to encourage collaboration with other organizations, stimulate development of models of adult education programs that may be replicated elsewhere in the state, provide incentives for adults, employers, and providers to encourage adults to establish and accomplish learning contracts, provide incentives to encourage participation in adult education, assist providers of county and area programs in areas of highest need, and for other initiatives of regional or statewide significance as determined by the cabinet. The Collaborative Center for Literacy Development: Early Childhood through Adulthood created under KRS 164.0207 shall evaluate the reading and literacy components of model programs funded under this paragraph.

Research and demonstration. The funds shall be used to develop:

Standards for the preparation, professional development, and support for adult educators with the advice of the Office of Adult Education and as compatible with funds provided under Title II of the Federal Workforce Investment Act;

A statewide competency-based certification for transferable skills in the workplace; and

A statewide public information and marketing campaign.

HISTORY:
Repealed and reenact., Acts 2000, ch. 526, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 211, § 104, effective July 12, 2006; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2019, ch. 146, § 49, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.410.
Adult education learning system — Services — Duties and responsibilities of the Kentucky Adult Education Program. [Repealed and reenacted.]